test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTA_AM_CNJ_waabam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA+Cnj - AM - waabmaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	    2	    3	    4       5       6
  #theme    neg     persnum periph  prt     dub
     
     #this is extrapolated from book (p 295-301)
     #book has +Dub in -e(n) for positive, -en(h) for negative
     #regularized to across the board -enh
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin->isinoon (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1PlO: waabmiswaang  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1PlO: waabmiswaang  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1SgO: waabmisweg    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmiswan       #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigsiwaanh    #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1PlO:   waabmigsiwaang #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+21PlO: waabmigsiwang #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2PlO:   waabmigsiweg    #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigsiwan       #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Pl+2PlO: waabmigoosweg #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigooswan    #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: waabmisnoon'gog #1sg v 2pl'
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnoonaanh     #1sg v 2sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj) THIS IS REPLACES NULL THEME SIGN
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin->isinow, isinoow  (2 obj)
     #      -igo (3sg v 2pl) THIS IS NEW -> probable typo

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Pl+3PlO:   waabmaaswangdwaa    #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Pl+3SgO:      waabmaaswangid      #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlO:      waabmaaswagwaa      #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgO:         waabmaaswag         #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+21Pl+3PlO: waabmaaswangwaa     #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+21Pl+3SgO:    waabmaaswang        #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlO:   waabmaaswegwaa      #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgO:      waabmaasweg         #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlO:      waabmaaswadwaa      #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmaaswad         #2sg v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+1PlO: waabmiswangdwaa   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmiswangid         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+21PlO: waabmisnowngwaa  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+21PlO:    waabmisnowang     #3sg v 21pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+2PlO:    waabmisnoowegwaa     #3pl v 2pl

     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+2PlO:    waabmisnoweg     #3sg v 2pl !expect this if neg = negprt-prt in book
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+2PlO:    waabmigsiweg     #3sg v 2pl !book has this (perhaps an error?)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj) THIS IS NEW (relative to positive forms)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin->isinow, isinoow  (2 obj)
     #      NULL THEME ABSENT
     #      (might expect -igo from neu neg (3sg v 2pl), but not)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Pl+3PlO:   waabmaaswangdwaaba  #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Pl+3SgO:      waabmaaswangdiba      #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlO:      waabmaaswagwaaba    #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgO:         waabmaaswagba       #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+21Pl+3PlO: waabmaaswangwaaba   #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+21Pl+3SgO:    waabmaaswangba      #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlO:   waabmaaswegwaaba    #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgO:      waabmaaswegba       #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlO:      waabmaaswadwaaba    #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmaaswadba       #2sg v 3sg
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmaaswidba       #2sg v 3sg !book has wid instead of wad (!)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: waabmiswangdwaaba #3pl v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: waabmisiiwngidwaaba #3pl v 1pl !book has siiw instead of siw
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmiswangdiba       #3sg v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmisiiwngidba       #3sg v 1pl !bookindicates variation between siw and siiw

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+21PlO: waabmisnowngwaaba  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+21PlO:    waabmisnowngiba     #3sg v 21pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+2PlO:    waabmisnoowegwaaba   #3pl v 2pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+2PlO:    waabmisnowegwaaba   #3pl v 2pl !book has isinow ... which makes more sense than isinoow here/in neutral (usually a dub thing)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+2PlO:    waabmigsinwegba   #3sg v 2pl !book 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+2PlO:    waabmigsiwegba   #3sg v 2pl !expected if prt neg extends neg, but perhaps neg was wrong...

     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -aa (3 obj) THIS IS NEW (relative to positive forms)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin->isinow, isinoow  (2 obj)
     #      -igo (3sg v 2pl) THIS IS NEW
     #      NULL THEME ABSENT

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Pl+3PlO:   waabmaasiiwngidwaawenh     #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Pl+3SgO:      waabmaasiiwngidenh      #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlO:      waabmaasiiwgwaawenh      #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgO:         waabmaasiiwgenh         #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+21Pl+3PlO: waabmaasiiwngwaawenh     #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+21Pl+3SgO:    waabmaasiiwngenh        #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlO:   waabmaasiiwegwaawenh      #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgO:      waabmaasiiwegenh         #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlO:      waabmaasiiwdwaawenh      #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmaasiiwdenh         #2sg v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+1PlO: waabmisiiwngidwaawenh   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmisiiwngidenh         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+21PlO: waabmisnoowngwaawenh  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+21PlO:    waabmisnoowngenh     #3sg v 21pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+2PlO:    waabmisnoowegwaawenh     #3pl v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+2PlO:    waabmigsiiwegwenh     #3sg v 2pl !cons
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+2PlO:    waabmisnoowegwenh    #3sg v 2pl !book guess, currently have isinoo for 3pl but not 3 as a general pattern


     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin->isinoon (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1PlO: waabmiswaangba  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1PlO: waabmiswaangba  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: waabmiswegba    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmiswamba     #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1PlO:   waabmigsiwaangba #0 v 1pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigsiwaamba   #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+21PlO: waabmigsiwngiba #0 v 21pl !book unsure 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2PlO:   waabmigsiwegba    #0 v 2pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigsiwmba     #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: waabmigooswegba #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigooswamba  #1pl v 2sg !book indicates optional siiw (yikes)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: waabmisnoon'gogba #1sg v 2pl !'predict this
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: waabmisnoonwegba #1sg v 2pl !book has this, is unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnoonaambaanh   #1sg v 2sg !cons guess
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnoonaambaa   #1sg v 2sg !book unsure

     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 2, 3, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin->isiino, isinoon (?) (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1PlO: waabmisiiwaangenh  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1PlO: waabmisiiwaangenh  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1SgO: waabmisiiwegwenh    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmisiiwnenh       #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigsiiwaanenh    #0 v 1sg  !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1PlO:   waabmigsiiwaangenh #0 v 1pl    !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+21PlO: waabmigsiiwngenh #0 v 21pl     !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2PlO:   waabmigsiiwegwenh    #0 v 2pl  !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigsiiwnenh       #0 v 2sg !cons best guess

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Pl+2PlO: waabmigooswegwenh #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigooswanenh    #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2PlO: waabmisnoon'gogwenh #1sg v 2pl !'cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnoonaanenh     #1sg v 2sg (cons)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2SgO:    waabmisiinwaanenh     #1sg v 2sg (book, has irregular sii length, short o)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik->isinog  (3 v 2sg) (treated as Thm2a!)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+4O: waabmaasgwaa   #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+4O:    waabmaasig     #3sg v 3obv  !book omits form!

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+1SgO: waabmisgwaa   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+1SgO:    waabmisig         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+4+3PlO: waabmigsigwaa #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigsigwaa #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+4+3SgO:    waabmigsig      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgO:    waabmigsig      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+2SgO: waabmisnokwaa   #3pl v 2sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnog         #3sg v 2sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik->isinog  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+4O: waabmaasiiwaapa   #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+4O:    waabmaasiipa   #3sg v 3obv  

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: waabmisgwaaba   #3pl v 1sg !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+1SgO:    waabmisgoba         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+4+3PlO: waabmigsigwaaba #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigsigwaaba #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+4+3SgO:    waabmigsigba    #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg !book semi-unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgO:    waabmigsigba    #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg !book semi-unsure
